Utah statutes.
4-10-6.   Unlawful acts specified.
It is unlawful for any person to:
(1)  sell bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing, or filling
material as new unless it is made from new material and properly tagged;
(2)  sell bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing or filling material
made from secondhand material which is not properly tagged;
(3)  use burlap or other material which has been used for packing or baling,
or to use any unsanitary, filthy, or vermin or insect infected filling
material in the manufacture or repair of any article;
(4)  sell bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing or filling material
which is not properly tagged regardless of point of origin;
(5)  use any false or misleading statement, term, or designation on any tag;
or
(6)  use any false or misleading label.
